Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.200

Board of trustees—Trustees not compensated—Contract interest barred—Reimbursement for travel expenses.

No trustee shall receive any compensation or emolument whatever for services as trustee; nor shall any trustee have or acquire any personal interest in any lease or contract whatsoever, made by the county or board of trustees with respect to such hospital or institution: PROVIDED, That each member of a board of trustees of a county hospital may be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, in addition, trustees of a county hospital shall be reimbursed for travel expenses for traveling from their home to a trustee meeting at a rate provided for in RCW 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[ 1984 c 26 s 17; 1979 ex.s. c 17 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.200. Prior: 1931 c 139 s 5; RRS s 6090-13.]